Hawaii statutes.
PART
VIII. CORPORATE CREDIT UNION

§412:10-800 Application of part.
Provisions of this part shall govern the formation and operations of a
corporate credit union. Only one corporate credit union may be chartered under
this article and as such shall have the exclusive right to use the term
"corporate credit union" as part of its name. All parts of this
chapter not inconsistent with this part shall apply. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next